District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0027.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Case Closure and Witness Support Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Illegal Firearm Sale and Distribution Strict Liability Act of 1992, effective
June 11, 1992 (D.C. Law 9-115; D.C. Official Code § 7–2531.04) is amended by adding new
subsections (c-1) and (c-2) to read as follows:
“(c-1) The Chief of Police of the Metropolitan Police Department is directed to
provide for the payment of no less than $50,000.00 to any person who provides information that


leads to the adjudication or conviction of the person or persons responsible for committing any
homicide in the District of Columbia.
“(c-2) In advertising the Firearms Bounty Fund, the Mayor shall include
information regarding witness assistance resources that may be available to those who provide
information, as established in Section 4 of the Case Closure and Witness Support Amendment
Act of 2023, effective ______.”.
A new paragraph (h) is added to read as follows:
“(h) No reward money paid pursuant to this section shall be paid to any officer or
employee of the Metropolitan Police Department, or of any penal, correctional, or welfare
institutions, or of any court, legal agency, or other agency closely involved in the criminal justice
system.”.
Sec. 3. Comprehensive Homicide Elimination Strategy Task Force to issue report on
witness protection, relocation, and assistance.
(a) Section 501 of the Homeland Security, Risk Reduction, and Preparedness
Amendment Act of 2006, effective March 14, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-262; D.C. Official Code § 22-
4251), is amended by adding a new subsection (e) to read as follows:
“(e) No later than December 1, 2025, the Task Force shall submit to the Council a report
on the District’s programs and policies for witness protection, relocation, and assistance, and
recommendations for improvement.
(1) The study shall include:
(A) An outline of the current witness protection procedures in the District
and regionally, including:
(i) The process of assessing the need of potential witnesses to


criminal proceedings for assistance;
(ii) The District’s approach to ensuring witness safety during
criminal investigations as well as before, during, or subsequent to, legal proceedings;
(iii) The spectrum of housing, financial, and health supports
available to those deemed eligible for witness assistance;
(iv) Information on whether those receiving witness assistance are
assigned a direct caseworker to navigate supportive services, and the average caseload for such
workers; and,
(v) A review of how the District’s public safety agencies
coordinate with regional and federal partners on witness relocation and assistance.
(B) Recommended performance metrics for witness assistance and an
assessment of past performance;
(C) A review of national best practices for state and local-level witness
protection, relocation, and assistance;
(D) A review of human support services offered to District residents that
would enhance witness assistance outcomes if program eligibility were expanded;
(E) An assessment of the overall fiscal impact of witness assistance, for at
least the prior four fiscal years, recommended funding levels;
(F) An analysis of criminal cases that were helped or hindered by the
current administration of witness assistance; and,
(G) Recommendations on policy and appropriations changes that would
maximize the effective use of witness protection, relocation, and assistance for the investigation
and prosecution criminal cases.


(2) Notwithstanding the requirements of this subsection, the Task Force may
restrict or prohibit disclosure of certain information, pursuant to Section 2c of the Council of the
District of Columbia Independence Act of 1982, effective March 11, 2010 (D.C. Law 18-119;
D.C. Official Code § 1-301.44c), that may compromise the safety of any person currently or
formerly served by witness relocation and assistance programs.
Section 4. Witness Protection and Assistance.
(a) There is established a Witness Protection and Assistance Program (“Program”), to
increase efforts to successfully investigate and prosecute criminal cases through assistance in the
security and wellbeing of those who aid in investigations or criminal proceedings.
(b) The Mayor shall administer the Program in coordination with the United States
Attorney’s Office and other regional jurisdictions.
(c) In any criminal proceeding, or in the process of a criminal investigation by MPD or
other law enforcement agencies, where credible evidence exists of a substantial danger that a
person may suffer intimidation, retaliatory violence, or another serious threat to personal
wellbeing due to their cooperation with an investigation or their testimony in a criminal trial, the
Mayor shall provide witness protection, relocation, and assistance, which may include any of the
following:
(1) Protection or escort by law enforcement or security personnel before, during,
or subsequent to, legal proceedings;
(2) Temporary or permanent physical relocation to an alternate residence;
(3) Housing expenses, including utilities;
(4) Transportation or storage of personal possessions;
(5) Appropriate documents to establish a new identity;


(6) Basic living expenses, including, food, transportation, and health care;
(7) Mental health supports;
(8) Reimbursement of lost wages;
(9) Childcare; and,
(10) Other services as needed.
(d) Family, friends, or associates of a witness who are deemed to be endangered shall
also be eligible for the Program.
(e) The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act,
approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall
issue rules to implement the provisions of this section.
100 Sec. 5. Fiscal Impact.
101 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
102 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
103 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
104 Sec. 6. Effective date.
105 This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
106 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
107 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
108 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
109 Columbia Register.